en: Beef sirloin steak red label
fr: Faux-filet de boeuf label rouge

en: Grilled beef sirloin steak, Pan-fried beef sirloin steak
fr: Faux-filet de boeuf grillé, Faux-filet de boeuf poêlé

en: Roasted beef sirloin steak, Baked beef sirloin steak
fr: Faux-filet de boeuf rôti, Faux-filet de boeuf cuit au four

en: Frozen beef sirloin steak
fr: Faux-filet de boeuf surgelé

en: Beef topside
fr: Tende de tranche de boeuf

en: Roasted beef topside, Baked beef topside
fr: Tende de tranche de boeuf rôtie, Tende de tranche de boeuf cuite au four

en: Beef blood
bg: Говежда кръв
fr: Sang de boeuf
hr: Goveđa krv
lt: Jautienos kraujas

en: Beef hanger steak
fr: Onglet de boeuf

en: Grilled beef hanger steak
fr: Onglet de boeuf grillé

en: Beef rump steak
fr: Rumsteck de boeuf, Rumsteak de boeuf
hr: Goveđi ramstek
ja: 牛ランプ

en: Grilled beef rump steak
fr: Rumsteck de boeuf grillé, Rumsteak de boeuf grillé

en: Frozen beef rump steak
fr: Rumsteck de boeuf surgelé, Rumsteak de boeuf surgelé

en: Roast beef, Roasted beef, Baked roast beef
fr: Rosbif rôti, Rosbif cuit au four
hr: Pečena govedina
ja: ローストビーフ

en: Beef shoulder
bg: Говежда плешка
fr: Epaule de boeuf
hr: Goveđa lopatica
ja: 牛肩肉
lt: Jautienos mentė

en: Frozen beef shoulder
fr: Epaule de boeuf surgelée

en: Beef livers, Beef liver
fr: Foies de boeuf, Foie de boeuf

en: Young cow liver
fr: Foie de génisse

en: Cooked young cow liver
fr: Foie de génisse cuit

en: Crocodile meats
fr: Viande de crocodile, filet de crocodile
hr: Krokodilsko meso
ja: ワニの肉
lt: Krokodilo mėsa

en: Rabbit meat
bg: Заешко месо
de: Hasenfleisch
es: Carne de conejo
fi: kanin liha
fr: Viande de lapin, lapin, lapins, viande de lapins, viandes de lapin, viandes de lapins
hr: Zečje meso
it: Carne di coniglio
ja: うさぎの肉
lt: Triušiena
nl: Konijn, Konijnenvlezen